Nebraska, session 109, LB1034.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1034 LB1034
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2701 The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Our public school children, faculty, and staff are entitled to
be safe in schools when they attend school and study or work;
(2) Schools have an interest in keeping students safe;
(3) The interest of schools in keeping students safe may include the
presence of school resource officers or security guards if a school
district determines such resources are necessary to keep schools safe;
(4) Parents and guardians of students have a vested interest in
being informed of school discipline matters involving their children and
to be notified as soon as possible if their children are contacted in
response to a possible law violation, questioned, searched, cited, or
arrested by a peace officer working with school officials;
(5) A comprehensive and clear memorandum of understanding between
law enforcement and school officials will delineate the roles and
responsibilities of school resource officers, security guards, and school
officials to balance the interests of safety for students and school
staff in relation to parental rights, student success, and family
integrity, with the goal that an increased law enforcement presence at
schools will not result in a disparate impact on students in federally
identified demographic categories; and
(6) Schools have a duty to respond to and manage disciplinary
issues. The primary role of school resource officers and security
officers should be to enhance safety with the understanding that school
resource officers also work to prevent and respond to law violations and
serve as a community resource for students, parents, and school staff;
and .
(7) Schools have a duty to maintain safe and orderly environments
for learning, to respect the privacy and constitutional rights of
students and school employees, to ensure that no school employee
-2-

LB1034 LB1034
2026 2026
facilitates immigration enforcement activities on school grounds absent a
valid judicial warrant, to comply with lawful court orders, and to
respond to exigent circumstances.
Sec. 2. Section 79-2702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2702 For purposes of sections 79-2701 to 79-2704 and section 3 of
this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Department means the State Department of Education;
(2) Law enforcement agency means an agency or department of this
state or of any political subdivision of this state that is responsible
for the prevention and detection of crime, the enforcement of the penal,
traffic, or highway laws of this state or any political subdivision of
this state, and the enforcement of arrest warrants. Law enforcement
agency includes a police department, an office of a town marshal, an
office of a county sheriff, the Nebraska State Patrol, and any department
to which a deputy state sheriff is assigned as provided in section
84-106;
(3) Peace officer has the same meaning as in section 28-109;
(4) School resource officer means any peace officer who is assigned,
as his or her primary duty, to any school district to provide law
enforcement and security services to any public elementary or secondary
school and does not mean a peace officer responding to a call for
service, providing proactive enforcement, providing law enforcement or
traffic direction for a school-related event, or providing temporary
services as a school resource officer when the assigned school resource
officer is not available;
(5) Security agency means a contractor that employs security guards
used by a school district; and
(6) Security guard means a person who is contracted or employed by a
security agency to protect buildings and people and who does not have law
enforcement authority or the power to arrest under any apparent authority
-3-

LB1034 LB1034
2026 2026
in the jurisdiction where such person is contracted or employed as a
security guard. A security guard may be an off-duty peace officer; and .
(7) Valid judicial warrant means a warrant issued and signed by a
judge or magistrate of a court of competent jurisdiction that
specifically authorizes the access sought. An administrative warrant,
immigration detainer, notice to appear, administrative subpoena, or other
document issued by a federal agency without specific judicial approval
shall not be considered a valid judicial warrant.
Sec. 3. No school employee, contractor, or agent of a school
district shall permit access to students, school employees, school
grounds, or school facilities by a federal immigration enforcement
officer for the purpose of immigration enforcement unless such officer
presents a valid judicial warrant. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to prohibit a school employee from complying with a valid
judicial warrant or court order or from responding to exigent
circumstances involving an immediate threat to the health or safety of a
student or school employee.
Sec. 4. Original sections 79-2701 and 79-2702, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-4-